src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/adj-odd_gt-desc.gen.yaml
  Adj - gohpevuđot: # AGAdj
    gohpevuđot+A+Attr:   [gohpevuđot, gohpivuđot]
    gohpevuđot+A+Sg+Gen: [gohpevuđot, gohpevuđoga, gohpivuđoga, gohpivuđot]
    gohpevuđot+A+Sg+Ill: [gohpevuđogii, gohpivuđogii]
    gohpevuđot+A+Sg+Com: [gohpevuđogiin, gohpevuđogiinna, gohpivuđogiin, gohpivuđogiinna]
    gohpevuđot+A+Pl+Com: [gohpevuđogiiguin, gohpivuđogiiguin]
